test/src/morphology/V-maengw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - mängõ: # Verb 14 'eng /est mängida/fin' - full paradigm
     mängõ+V+Inf: mängõ
     mängõ+V+Ger: mängõs
     mängõ+V+Sup: mǟngam
     mängõ+V+Sup+Ine: mǟngamõs
     mängõ+V+Sup+Ela: mǟngamõst
     mängõ+V+Sup+Tra: mǟngamõks
     mängõ+V+Sup+Abe: mǟngamõt
     mängõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mǟngab
     mängõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mǟngat
     mängõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mǟngabõd
     mängõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mǟngiz
     mängõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mǟngizt, mǟngiztõ]
     mängõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mǟngizt, mǟngiztõ]
     mängõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: mäng
     mängõ+V+Cond+Sg3: mǟngaks
     mängõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: manga
     mängõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: mängõ
     mängõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mǟngagid
     mängõ+V+Jus+Sg3: mǟngag
     mängõ+V+QuoSg3: mǟngaji
     mängõ+V+ActPrfPrc: mängõn
     mängõ+V+PssPrfPrc: mängdõd
